Hawaii statutes.
§159-15 Bonding. Upon a person being
granted a license to slaughter animals for the purpose of using the meat or
meat products thereof in intrastate commerce, the board shall exact from the
licensee a bond, or other form of surety acceptable to the board or an
appropriate agent, officer, or employee designated by the board, in the penal
sum of $5,000, the bond or other form of surety to be obtained from a surety
company or financial institution authorized to do business in the State and to
be so conditioned that the licensee shall be required to keep a full and
accurate record concerning every animal which the licensee may purchase, kill,
or sell; and that the licensee will at all times during regular business hours
keep the record open for the inspection by representatives of the board who may
desire to examine the same. The record shall contain:

(1) The sex of the animal.

(2) A full description of each and every brand on the
animal, stating the position of each brand on the animal. If any of the described
brands on the animal appear to be obliterated, as described in section 142-47,
or to be felonious, as described in section 142-48, the person shall make a
report of the obliterated or felonious brand to the appropriate law enforcement
agency pursuant to rules adopted by the department of agriculture.

(3) Ear tag number or other mark of identification.

(4) The principal color of the animal.

(5) The name of the person who sold the animal to the
licensee.

(6) The date when the animal was sold to the licensee.

(7) The date when the animal was delivered to the
licensee.

(8) The date when the animal was killed. [L 1969, c
214, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 163, §4; am L 1989, c 92, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next